Lists of JDs for Technical Program Manager
__________________________________________________

1)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-ediscovery-augusta-infotech-bengaluru-7-to-12-years-110324007119?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=2&px=1
Job description
We are currently seeking a Technical Project Manager in India to support the growing ESI (Electronically Stored Information) business and its workflow automation initiatives. This position is responsible for planning, organizing, and executing technical projects in support of Service Delivery business operations end-to-end workflow automation. The successful candidate will partner with Service Delivery Intake/Processing/Publishing Value Stream business to set the roadmap for improvement, extension of capabilities, and efficiency gains. Under the direction of the Executive Director (India) and Head of Technical Program Management (USA) the TPM will be responsible for all aspects of planning, executing and managing our projects, tasks, schedules and reporting including project communications.


Primary responsibilities

Work closely with leadership, technical teams and other resources to plan, scope and deliver multiple projects on budget and on schedule
Manage all aspects and phases of ESI Automation initiatives - technical resources, implementation plan, schedule, budgets and reporting, etc.
Identify requirements needed from external and cross-functional teams
Analyze and evaluate project risks
Effectively coordinate the resources and schedules across projects with competing priorities
Expert at defining what done is and helping the teams achieve this.
Familiarity with ESI and Automation processes
Expert documentation skills
Lead standups, team meetings, lessons-learned and other meetings
Ability to help engineers translate business requirements into deliverables
Develop standardized processes
Assess program effectiveness and optimize ROI
Prepare reports, status and expected artifacts

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND BEHAVIOURS


Agile and Waterfall experience
ESI experience desired. Familiarity with ESI intake, processing and publishing technologies and terminologies
Expertise in managing multiple competing priorities and competing deadlines with varied stakeholders
Ability to take initiative, and exercise professional, independent judgment to plan work, formulate recommendations, and make sound decisions
Exceptional organizational skills
Excellent problem-solving aptitude
Fantastic communication skills, both oral and written
Knowledge of relevant Project Management tools
Exceptional oral and written communication skills

QUALIFICATIONS

1 to 3 years' experience in e-Discovery
Bachelor's degree

2)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-varite-bengaluru-0-to-6-years-170624502653?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=3&px=1
Job description
We trust each other to do our best work where it works best for us and our teams.
This role offers a hybrid work option, meaning you can both work from home and commute to a company office, depending on what s best for you and when it is important for your team to be together.
The Client Trust Engineering team is looking for a Technical Program Manager (TPM) to join our team and drive technology programs and initiatives.
The successful candidate will have a solid track record of technical program and project management and will have demonstrated excellent leadership, stakeholder management along with superior organizational and communication skills in leading cross functional programs to deliver successful outcomes.
The right candidate should be able to manage multiple concurrent programs with competing priorities.
This position will report to technical program management leadership.
Essential Job Functions:
Support multiple cross-functional technical teams to deliver their objectives in a fast-paced and complex programs and projects.
Develop strong partnerships with engineering, product management, partner teams to drive focus on strategic and tactical program objectives.
Support driving teams and individuals in planning and executing roadmaps, releases, and work backlogs
Support efforts to identify risks, resolve key project conflicts, and establish appropriate resolution paths.
Fill in gaps across roles and functions as needed, be the adaptive problem solver.
Provide reporting as necessary on portfolio roadmap, health, status, risks, issues and mitigation plans.
Qualifications:
Basic:
B.S. degree or equivalent
4+ years of technical program management experience within an engineering organization, with overall 7+ years in the industry.
Preferred:
Direct work experience in a technical program management capacity to drive large technical initiatives including all aspects of process development and execution.
Knowledge of technical ecosystems and adequate technical depth.
Experience managing multiple major and concurrent projects/programs.
Direct experience working with software engineering leadership, technical teams, and individual contributors.
Experience managing the lifecycle of large-scale programs and projects.
Excellent communication skills; skilled at cross-functional and cross-organizational communication and attention to detail.
Experience with software engineering practices and familiarity with coding techniques.
Ability to quickly adapt to the faster pace, shifting priorities, demands, and timelines through analytical and problem-solving capabilities
Experience in planning and collaboration tools.
Suggested Skills:
Program Management
Communication
Stakeholder Management
3)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-avalara-technologies-pvt-ltd-pune-5-to-9-years-110624906773?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=4&px=1
Job description
What Youll Do

As a Technical Program Manager at Avalara, you will be responsible for planning, executing, and overseeing technical programs within Information Technology that drive our success.

You will collaborate closely with cross-functional teams, partners, and stakeholders to ensure program objectives are met within scope and timeline.

It will be up to you to convert product vision and requirements into the finished product. This role is an excellent opportunity for an experienced individual looking to take their career to the next level in a fast-paced and dynamic environment.


Key Responsibilities:

- Communication: Act as a bridge between technical teams, management, and other stakeholders. Provide regular program updates to senior managers and address their concerns. Manage and resolve risks, issues, and dependencies.

- Program Planning and Strategy: Work with senior program managers to create program plans and strategies. Define the program's scope, objectives, and deliverables. Collaborate with stakeholders to maintain a multi-quarter delivery roadmap. Create and maintain comprehensive program reports.

- Program Execution: Coordinate program activities, tasks, and resources, and remove obstacles. Monitor program progress and take corrective actions as needed. Ensure adherence to program timelines and processes.

- Stakeholder Management: Keep key stakeholders informed about program progress. Build relationships with program and cross-functional teams to drive program goals. Work with stakeholders to ensure customer needs are met and facilitate communication.

- Risk and Issue Management: Assess program execution and escalate risks in a timely manner. Track risks to closure to minimize their impact. Identify potential changes to initial assumptions and take proactive steps to mitigate risks.

- Process Improvement: Identify and implement process improvements across project teams. Participate in quality improvement initiatives. Contribute to improving processes within the organisation.

- Team Leadership: Lead and motivate cross-functional program teams. Cultivate a collaborative and innovative program culture. Mentor and guide team members when needed.

- Methodology: Apply the organisation's Software Development Life Cycle framework to the program.

Maintain standard program documents, such as status updates, program charter, roadmaps, and checklists.



What You'll Need to be Successful

- Bachelor's degree in a relevant field (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering).

- Minimum 5 or more years of technical project / program management experience in a software, SaaS or systems development environment - including internal process development and change management

- Strong knowledge of Program and Project management methodologies, tools, and best practices. - Excellent interpersonal, communication, and leadership influencing skills.

- Proficiency in Program/Project management software (e.g. Jira, Confluence, Power BI) Preferred - SAFe Agilist, PMP, CSM or similar Project management certification - ITIL Foundation Certification

4)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-avalara-technologies-pvt-ltd-pune-5-to-9-years-110624906544?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=5&px=1
Job description
What Youll Do

As a Technical Program Manager at Avalara, you will be responsible for planning, executing, and overseeing technical programs that drive our success.

You will collaborate closely with cross-functional teams, partners, and stakeholders to ensure program objectives are met within scope and timeline.

It will be up to you to convert product vision and requirements into the finished product. This role is an excellent opportunity for an experienced individual looking to take their career to the next level in a fast-paced and dynamic environment.

Avalara is a global company with engineering centres across multiple locations in the world. We work in an open, supportive, collaborative environment that makes taxes and compliance less taxing to deal with.

Despite our size, we maintain a startup culture focused on building great software and having the maximum impact on the world that we can have and having fun while doing it. Check us out. We would love to talk to you about what we are up to.


Key Responsibilities:

Communication: Act as a bridge between technical teams, management, and other stakeholders. Provide regular program updates to senior managers and address their concerns.

Manage and resolve risks, issues, and dependencies.

Program Planning and Strategy: Work with senior program managers to create program plans and strategies.

Define the program's scope, objectives, and deliverables. Collaborate with stakeholders to maintain a multi-quarter delivery roadmap. Create and maintain comprehensive program reports.

Program Execution: Coordinate program activities, tasks, and resources, and remove obstacles. Monitor program progress and take corrective actions as needed. Ensure adherence to program timelines and processes.

Stakeholder Management: Keep key stakeholders informed about program progress. Build relationships with program and cross-functional teams to drive program goals.

Work with stakeholders to ensure customer needs are met and facilitate communication. Risk and Issue Management: Assess program execution and escalate risks in a timely manner.

Track risks to closure to minimize their impact. Identify potential changes to initial assumptions and take proactive steps to mitigate risks.

Process Improvement: Identify and implement process improvements across project teams. Participate in quality improvement initiatives. Contribute to improving processes within the organisation.

Team Leadership: Lead and motivate cross-functional program teams. Cultivate a collaborative and innovative program culture. Mentor and guide team members when needed.

Methodology: Apply the organisation's Software Development Life Cycle framework to the program. Maintain standard program documents, such as status updates, program charter, roadmaps, and checklists.



What You'll Need to be Successful

Bachelor's degree in a relevant field (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering).

Minimum of 5 years of experience in technical program/project management or a related role.

Strong knowledge of Program and Project management methodologies, tools, and best practices.

Excellent interpersonal, communication, and leadership influencing skills.

Proficiency in Program/Project management software (e.g. Jira, Confluence, Power BI) SAFe Agilist, PMP or similar Project management certification is a plus.

5)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-avalara-pune-5-to-10-years-060624501376?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=6&px=1
Job description
As a Technical Program Manager at Avalara, you will be responsible for planning, executing, and overseeing technical programs that drive our success. You will collaborate closely with cross-functional teams, partners, and stakeholders to ensure program objectives are met within scope and timeline. It will be up to you to convert product vision and requirements into the finished product. This role is an excellent opportunity for an experienced individual looking to take their career to the next level in a fast-paced and dynamic environment.
 
Key Responsibilities:
Communication : Act as a bridge between technical teams, management, and other stakeholders. Provide regular program updates to senior managers and address their concerns. Manage and resolve risks, issues, and dependencies.
Program Planning and Strategy: Work with senior program managers to create program plans and strategies. Define the programs scope, objectives, and deliverables. Collaborate with stakeholders to maintain a multi-quarter delivery roadmap. Create and maintain comprehensive program reports.
Program Execution: Coordinate program activities, tasks, and resources, and remove obstacles. Monitor program progress and take corrective actions as needed. Ensure adherence to program timelines and processes.
Stakeholder Management: Keep key stakeholders informed about program progress. Build relationships with program and cross-functional teams to drive program goals. Work with stakeholders to ensure customer needs are met and facilitate communication.
Risk and Issue Management: Assess program execution and escalate risks in a timely manner. Track risks to closure to minimize their impact. Identify potential changes to initial assumptions and take proactive steps to mitigate risks.
Process Improvement: Identify and implement process improvements across project teams. Participate in quality improvement initiatives. Contribute to improving processes within the organisation.
Team Leadership: Lead and motivate cross-functional program teams. Cultivate a collaborative and innovative program culture. Mentor and guide team members when needed.
Methodology: Apply the organisations Software Development Life Cycle framework to the program. Maintain standard program documents, such as status updates, program charter, roadmaps, and checklists.
What you'll Need to be Successful

Bachelors degree in a relevant field (eg Computer Science, Engineering).
Minimum of 5 years of experience in technical program/project management or a related role.
Strong knowledge of Program and Project management methodologies, tools, and best practices.
Excellent interpersonal, communication, and leadership influencing skills.
Proficiency in Program/Project management software (eg Jira, Confluence, Power BI)
SAFe Agilist, PMP or similar Project management certification is a plus.

6)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-airtel-networks-kenya-gurugram-10-to-13-years-060624500398?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=7&px=1
Job description
Airtel Networks Kenya is looking for Technical Program Manager to join our dynamic team and embark on a rewarding career journey
Project Planning: Creating detailed project plans, defining project scope, objectives, and deliverables, and identifying resource requirements
Execution and Delivery: Overseeing project execution, tracking progress, and ensuring that projects are delivered on time and within budget
Risk Management: Identifying potential risks and challenges that may impact project success and developing risk mitigation strategies
Communication: Facilitating effective communication among project team members, stakeholders, and leadership, ensuring transparency and alignment
Resource Management: Allocating resources efficiently and effectively, including assigning tasks and responsibilities to team members
Technical Expertise: Demonstrating a strong understanding of technical concepts and technologies relevant to the project, allowing effective collaboration with technical teams
Issue Resolution: Addressing and resolving project-related issues and roadblocks that may arise during the project lifecycle
Quality Assurance: Ensuring that project deliverables meet high-quality standards and align with defined technical specifications

7)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-ii-microsoft-india-r-and-d-pvt-ltd-noida-6-to-10-years-170624500283?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=8&px=1
Job description
Partner with product management, business, user research, design, and cross-functional engineering to define, scope, design and deliver technical specifications for player growth, engagement, and monetization feature areas that enable game creator success.
Contribute to the definition of program(s) goals and provides input to the prioritization for the group of features/feature areas.
Partners with teams to collect performance metrics and derive insights that lead to productive courses of action to improve development, iteration, and implementation of a group of features or feature areas.
Working across a large-scale, geographically diverse organization to deliver business outcomes.
Influence for impact - Act as a trusted resource and advisor to a wide network of colleagues with diverse personalities, creating influence strategies that cross organizational boundaries to achieve broad business goals, and anticipating issues or implications that their ideas would have on others and pursuing mutually beneficial strategies

8)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-endor-labs-bengaluru-6-to-10-years-120624501263?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=9&px=1
Job description
As a Technical Program Manager, you ll work hand-in-hand with product development teams and our Engineering teams to drive the delivery of new products and infrastructure using industry best practices in program management and Agile methodologies
You will work with stakeholders to plan requirements, manage program schedules, identify/mitigate risks, and communicate progress
Serve as the primary point of contact: Efficiently convey the actual status of the projects scope and status to the leadership teams. Are we on trackWhat are the risks
Work cross-functionally: Support and engage with teams outside of technology to gain alignment and support where needed with documentation, workflows, and relationship building
Establish clear visibility into program plans and progress, across levels, disciplines, and BUs, to ensure transparency and alignment of enterprise-wide stakeholders
Improve processes, standardize tools, and establish robust documentation systems spanning the full product development lifecycle
What were looking for
At least 5 years of experience in technical project/program management, preferably in a related industry (ideally SaaS)
Strong knowledge of project and program management methodologies, techniques, processes, and approaches
Strong knowledge of the full lifecycle of product development
Experience in product development planning
Strength in influencing decision-making and bringing teams to agreement
Skill in managing and resolving ambiguity
Ability to conduct tradeoff analysis and develop written and oral briefings explaining the outcome of those analyses
Demonstrated collaboration with software engineers
Expertise in Atlassian toolset ( Confluence - Jira )
Proven team player who embraces listening, straight talk, transparency, ownership, and accountability
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Solid track record of managing parallel projects/programs

9)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-tpm-vmware-india-bengaluru-3-to-4-years-250424500027?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=12&px=1
Job description
As a Technical Program Manager (TPM) at End -User Computing Division, Broadcom , you will play a pivotal role in driving the success of our projects and programs.
You will be responsible for overseeing the planning, execution, and delivery of complex technical initiatives and product releases within our organization.
Working closely with cross-functional teams, you will ensure alignment with business objectives , drive efficient execution, and maintain high-quality standards throughout the project lifecycle.
This role demands a combination of technical expertise , project management skills, and leadership capabilities to navigate through the dynamic landscape of Omnissas products and services.
Responsibilities:
Lead the success of one or multiple End-User Computing Division, Broadcom s products, services, and engineering initiatives across various geographical regions.
Serve as the authoritative and trusted leader of a software delivery team comprised of Product Managers, Development, Quality Engineering, and other functional units to execute release plans, ensuring adherence to schedules, dependencies, and risk management.
Utilize your technical acumen and product expertise to proactively identify risks, issues, and drive their resolution.
Drive continuous transformation of the release process, leaving your mark on the products under your management.
Independently and accurately report the state of your releases/initiatives to executives and other stakeholders.
Act as the reliable spokesperson on the state of releases/initiatives during key checkpoint reviews.
Oversee the transition of your release deliverables to the live environment post-driving legal compliance and launch activities.
Requirements:
bachelor's degree in computer science or a related field.
Minimum of 3 years of prior program and/or project management experience in enterprise software.
Solid grasp of project management principles with a dedication to delivering high-performance, quality software.
3-4 years of hands-on experience in software development.
Exceptional skills in influencing, teamwork, and delivering solutions within complex and ambiguous environments.
Ability to take full ownership of releases/initiatives and drive them to completion.
Proficiency in software development and project/program management fundamentals, including the software development lifecycle, quality processes, scoping, costs, schedules, deliverables, change and risk management, and mitigation.
Familiarity with agile frameworks and SaaS product delivery.
Excellent oral and written communication, interpersonal, and analytical skills.
Outstanding organizational, prioritization, and multitasking abilities.
Adaptability to change and comfort able working in high-paced, ambiguous environments.
Preferred Skills:
General knowledge of Atlassian suite (JIRA, Confluence, etc), build and release tools.
Understanding and knowledge of Continuous Delivery processes.
Project Management Certification or Certified Scrum Master certification.
Role: Program Manager

10)
link =https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-staff-technical-program-manager-platform-technology-opendoor-hyderabad-8-to-11-years-060624502810?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=13&px=1
Job description
We re looking for a talented and experienced Technical Program Manager to manage and implement Technology Platform Programs across Finance, Transaction, and Infrastructure functions for the broader Engineering team. You will be embedded with the Financial Platform and Platform Engineering teams, partnering with senior leadership across the organization to build the platforms that underpin our stabilization and scaling strategy, integrating internal services and 3rd party systems.
 
As a Technical Program Manager, you will:
Work with stakeholders and engineering leadership to formulate the technical roadmap to build the Financial Platform that will streamline our monthly financial close activities and capital markets processes
Formulate, structure and drive technical programs for the platform teams spanning Data Infrastructure, Analytics and the Foundation teams.
Create team processes and structure to scale collaboration with cross functional teams, with particular focus on India/North America seams
Strategize and secure technical alignment across the various Engineering, Product, Operations, and Design teams
Drive clarity and structure in ambiguous situations by asking the right questions and applying insights you ve gained
Drive quarterly and annual planning for the Financial Platform team and Platform Engineering team and across the India/North America seams.
We re looking for teammates who have:

8+ years as a TPM, engineering or product leader
Experience working across multiple functions/ business units, influencing and collaborating with others to successfully drive programs
Experience building technical roadmaps with a strong understanding of dependency management
Strong analytical and quantitative skills; ability to work with key stakeholders to define key business questions and to build data sets that answer those questions
Self-motivated, proactive and proven ability to work well with teams having different operating cadences.
Preferred Experience :

Experience building financial platforms and services
Detail-oriented and able to understand the bigger picture by using your technical expertise and problem solving abilities to prioritize and manage blocking issues.
Demonstrated ability to work through ambiguity to detailed solutions. You can take a vague problem, frame the challenge, identify a path forward, and drive an initiative over the finish-line.
Experience working in a highly cross-functional environment where communication with multiple functions (Operations, Product, Engineering, Infrastructure) is critical.

11)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-digital-commerce-retail-mastek-bangalore-bengaluru-12-to-20-years-091123008101?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=14&px=1
Job description
We have an immediate opening for the role of Technical Program Manager based out of Bangalore. Looking for candidates having experience in Digital Commerce, Order Management Systems or Retail Commerce domain. Below is the JD.


Job location - Bangalore

Experience - 12+ years

Mode - Hybrid

Role - Technical Program Manager

Qualifications:

Bachelors degree in Computer Science/Information Technology, or in a related technical field or equivalent technology experience.
10+years of progressively responsible, post-baccalaureate work experience designing, developing, and implementing computer software projects utilizing open-source services framework
5-10 years Project Management experience with expertise on Devops and CD/CI tools for Java Platform
5+ years’ experience in Digital Commerce, Order Management Systems, development, and delivery (highly valued)
Experience creating and executing implementation strategies for complex systems
Strong relationship management skills and understanding of organizational change management
Understanding of various delivery frameworks and practices (Waterfall, Agile, DevOps, Lean, etc.) and appropriate application of them
Ability to apply highly complex principles, theories and concepts of the technical discipline and provide solutions to a wide range of complex tasks, projects, and problem
Experience with CI/CD pipelines and automation, Docker & Container Management, Application Performance Engineering, Monitoring, performance, alerting, AWS Services and Architecture
Ability to determine estimates of effort and impacts for a variety of solutions and influence technical discussions and decisions
Experience in working with distributed Unix or Linux-based systems, J2EE Application Servers, clustered DB systems and source control systems
Strong organizational skills with the ability to track and prioritize numerous tasks and to coordinate activities with a high sense of urgency
Excellent presentation, verbal written, interpersonal and listening skills
Strong interpersonal and leadership skills including collaboration, facilitation, and negotiation
Strong collaboration skills to achieve business goals collectively across broad teams
Challenges the status quo, champions change and influences others to change

Must-haves:

Acknowledges the presence of choice in every moment and takes personal responsibility for their life
Possesses an entrepreneurial spirit and continuously innovates to achieve great results
Communicates with honesty and kindness and creates the space for others to do the same
Leads with courage, knowing the possibility of greatness is bigger than the fear of failure
Fosters connection by putting people first and building trusting relationships
Integrates fun and joy as a way of being and working, aka doesnt take themselves too seriously

12)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-itc-infotech-pune-7-to-10-years-220524011614?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=15&px=1'Job description
The Role:

• Act as Technical Program Manager for managing new product development

• Act as Scrum Master / SAFe agilist and drive all ceremonies

• Implement Scaled Agile Framework and / or other Agile methodologies

• Guide, mentor & coach the team(s) on Agile Scrum, SaFe and TDD principles

• Remove impediments with the right sense of urgency, or guide teams in doing so

• Build a trusting and safe environment for the team where problems are discussed without fear of blame, retribution, or being judged, with an emphasis on healing and problem solving

• Coordinate with various groups in MasterCard across locations to ensure success of the projects

• Being keenly aware of what is being delivered by the team and why, and the big program picture • Maintain, Radiate and Present project related information, & metrics for leadership review

• Coordinate initiatives for automation, defect metrics and overall quality initiatives

• Recommend strategic direction, continuous improvements and policy changes.

• Advance operational and business concerns or issues relative to future business programs, projects, or enhancements that may affect consistent delivery of quality services.

• Lead Project/Program management activities around cost, schedule, quality etc.


All About You:

Strong Program Management experience bringing new capabilities to market.

• Advanced technical knowledge and capability.

• Strong leadership, team player and collaborative style.

• Application Lifecycle Management experience.

• Strong Stakeholder Management.

• Effective Communicator - Technical and Business.

• Effective RAID Management.

• Effective KPI definition, monitoring and reporting.

• Experience in driving PCI assessment with Mastercard


Experience in defining and building cloud-native software products as a platform at scale with a deep understanding of those platforms capabilities and underlying technologies.

• Strong communication skills both verbal and written with strong relationship building, collaborative skills and organizational skills.

• Demonstrate ethics and values to generate high team trust

• Can communicate to executives, peers, and staff with impact, eloquence, and authenticity

• Expertise in Resource Capacity Management, Feature and story standardization, Creating and maintaining Delivery Dashboards - Intake, WIP, capacity, throughput, lead time, cycle time, cumulative flow, blockers

• Provide better visibility and transparency to the requesting team on priorities and progress

• Responsible for adherence to the Lean process as the team-level coach and fosters an environment for high-performing team dynamics, continuous flow, and relentless improvement

• Responsible for removing impediments and blockers from the team and ALM upkeep to support metrics

• Facilitates team meetings such as daily standups, backlog grooming and inspect and adapt

• Protects the team from outside influences and unauthorized sources of intake (anything not ALM or Remedy)

• Provides status and escalates any issues or blockers that the team cannot resolve to the Program Managers

• Train and guide members working on lean processes to improve metrics such as Lead/Cycle time


Think strategically, but stay on top of tactical execution rigorously inspecting the delivery plans and execution metrics of your TPMs using your own tech depth and business acumen to assess risks and continuously raising the delivery bar • Adapt to shifting goals and activities while managing multiple activities in parallel • Build and cultivate strong internal relationships


13)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-sendhelper-kolkata-mumbai-new-delhi-hyderabad-pune-chennai-bengaluru-7-to-11-years-180923501501?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=16&px=1
Job description
As a Technical Program Manager, youwill be responsible for planning, leading, organizing, and motivating projectteams to achieve a high level of performance and quality in deliveringprojects
You will be responsible for managing parallel high-impact programsusing agile methods in a fast-paced environment that may cross multiplebusiness divisions
As a Technical Program Manager, you will play differentroles while:

Leading and managing large, complex organization-level projects consisting of multiple internal and/or external teams or using functional knowledge, situation awareness, and experience in blending traditional project management principles and practices with an Agile development approach to deliver large, complex, mission-critical, enterprise-level projects with the right balance of agility and predictability.
Playing a consultative role to help put in place the appropriate people, processes, and tools along with coaching team members to optimize the efficiency and effectiveness of the project team.
Acting as a scrum master for at least 3 highly dynamic agile teams that involve running all the key ceremonies strategic initiatives.
Building group program management capabilities that will help teams to be autonomous and also that could be set as an example for other departments or functions.
Knowledge, Skills,and Attributes:
Project Planning and Stakeholder Management - Define RACI, project scope, and timelines/milestones while focusing on regular and timely delivery of value; identify and manage project assumptions, risks issues; monitor manage project tasks and activities.
Excellent oral and written communications skills and experience interacting with both business and IT individuals at all levels including the executive levels; drive steer-co, kick-off, and working group meetings; prepare and distribute weekly project reports; identify and manage cross-team dependencies.
Scrum Master - Assist in team development while holding teams accountable for their commitments, removing roadblocks to their work; leveraging organizational resources to improve capacity for project work; mentoring and developing team members; be a servant leader.
Product Owner Support - Support the Product Owner in grooming backlog, managing project scope, and setting customer expectations for project deliverables.
Process Management and Improvement - Define and manage a well-defined project management process and champion ongoing process improvement initiatives to implement best practices for Project Management; contribute to implementing an effective system of project governance that could be used by all departments or functions.
Roadmap Planning - Assist the team in properprioritization of the projects based on strategical objectives andorganizational goals; monitor the execution of the same ensuring they are met.

Requirements:

8+ years of total experience as a Project/Program Manager managing large, complex projects in a high-tech development environment with multi-functional teams.
5+ years of experience with SCRUM/Agile methodologies with a proven track record of running 3 or more scrum teams in parallel or enterprise-level application development projects successfully implementing multiple software or web development projects using Agile methodologies.
Solid understanding of SDLC models as well as expert knowledge of both Agile and traditional project management principles and practices and the ability to blend them together in the right proportions to fit a project and business environment.
Experience overseeing multi-function project teams including Developers, Product
Owners, Data Analysts, Designers, and QA Personnel.
Sufficient level of technical background to provide credible leadership to development teams and to be able to evaluate complex project risks and issues accurately and objectively.
PMP/CSM/PMI-ACP or equivalent certification is preferred, though not mandatory.
Solid understanding of and demonstrated experience in using appropriate project management tools such as Jira Confluence is a must.
Flexible to adapt to fast-paced environments multiple time zones.


14)
link= https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-hp-india-bengaluru-6-to-10-years-280524906106?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=17&px=1
Job description
Technical Program Manager
Description -

JD : Technical Project Manager

Experience: 10+ years of work experience, with at least 2 years of hands-on experience in defining & setting up large scale global programs, driving product roadmaps, generating customer insights, translating these insights into implementable requirements, drive operational excellence and setup execution rigor to deliver to business outcomes. Has strong technology experience, can provide inputs to and influence architecture & technology decision-making. Experience in end-to-end ecosystem engineering and/or cyber-physical systems a significant plus, but not mandatory. Possesses superior communication and influencing skills, can engage senior stakeholders

Roles and responsibilities

Work with customers & marketing teams to develop a deep understanding of customer needs
Work with platform teams to develop a deep understanding of existing / new technology capabilities to address customer needs
Synthesize customer & technology insights into prototypes and product capability roadmaps
Influence stakeholders on product vision, strategic intent & design objectives, business cases
Drive E2E technical system design and architecture across functional teams for their assigned solutions.
Develop detailed product & technical specifications
Enable clarity on customer experience related non-functional requirements (usability, performance, security, etc.)
Work with platform teams to translate specs to features & requirements
Prioritize requirements and refine scope in alignment with schedule, resource and quality
Develop, maintain, and report on program plans, metrics and dashboards
Anticipate program risks, carry out in-depth risk assessment and develop mitigation / tradeoff plans
Lead Agile sprint planning, develop user stories, manage backlog at Scrum of Scrum levels
Assume responsibility and drive ownership of issue resolution and process improvements across lifecycle and ecosystem
Manage releases to launch through product life cycle
Manage partner ecosystem to ensure high quality testing and product integration
Work with customer support teams on beta testing, warranty cost reduction, serviceability and supportability
Define and enable CPE strategy & releases for ongoing product updates, customer enhancements, big deals
Manage supplier ecosystem and contract performance
Measure and manage benefits during and after release to close loop on business case and enable change
Perform retrospective analysis, institutionalize improvements for continuous learning
Shift -

No shift premium (India)

15)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-essenware-private-limted-bengaluru-5-to-7-years-300323501217?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165&xp=19&px=1
Job description
o Manage application to migration into cloud native microservice based architecture

o Substantial experience and proven track record of successfully launching multi-dependent and sophisticated technology and infrastructure products and services

o Demonstrated ability to think creatively and strategically when implementing sophisticated multi-year programs that spans 10s of teams.

o Manage certification of Operating system, kernel, drivers, cloud platform releases, and platform readiness for application onboarding

o Manage complete project life cycle, project team and application owners

o Manage the team to handle Program Risk, Mitigation, align milestone with business strategy

o Able to lead from the front, prioritize, and drive the bigger mission forward by translating vision into results.

o Partner with all technical functions across the company to ensure all organizations are in sync toward program goal, dealing with high levels of ambiguity, seeing around corners to identify blockers, and ensuring needs are balanced against technical requirements.

o Ability to build plans, breakdown complex intricate problems into tactical tasks and strategize solutions

Minimum Qualifications

o B.S./B.Tech in Computer Science or a related technical discipline.

o 5+ years of software engineering, systems engineering, or technical product/program management experience.

o Experience in OS (CentOS, RedHat) engineering, Kubernetes architecture or micro-service or cloud-based application deployment

o Proven technical experience with infrastructure, cloud architecture and application technologiess

o Collaborative skills to work with multiple verticals and workstreams in a complex matrix organization

o Presentation skills to share findings, goals, risks, and synthesized data with executives

o Experience with Cloud computing, large-scale infra leveraging technologies such as Java, Python, Shell, C, C++, etc.

o Experience with scale, production with emphasis on Reliability, Efficiency, Scalability.

o Experience with large-scale distributed systems software engineering.

o Experience working with both Agile and Waterfall development methodologies and PMP or equivalent qualification

o Passion and drive for championing Cloud Transformation and cloud adoption success across the organization

16)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-hardware-nxp-semiconductors-noida-6-to-11-years-190324500343?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165_1&xp=1&px=2
Job description
As a Technical Program Manager your challenge will be to lead effective core teams with diverse technical leaders, helping them prioritize activities and communicate clearly while influencing peers and managers, and holding everyone accountable. You will drive strict project pace by accurately identifying technical risks for appropriate and timely closure.
 
Your responsibilities
As a Technical Program Manager you are responsible for:
Leading all phases of SoC projects from architectural definition to validation
Creating project plans with milestones, timelines, ownership, and drive delivery
Facilitating project calls with global cross-functional teams to drive progress and resolve issues
Facilitating project health check awareness and support executive/senior management reporting
Acting as the first line of contact for issue escalation
Providing balance in technical support for architectural approvals, development, documentation closure and source control management (quality control)
Ensuring that the team is effectively delivering on their objectives and all the plans are on track. Perform risk analysis, identify and execute on mitigation steps
Your profile
To be successful in this role you have:
BEng or MEng in Electrical or Computer Engineering
Deep knowledge of project management
Management experience with proactive and solution-oriented approach
Experience with Project Management tools such as MS Project or similar
General understanding of system design and architectural definition
Furthermore, you should have:
Strong analytical skills and familiarity with complex environments
Proven strong leadership skills, team player, able to challenge the status quo and capable to switch between detail and helicopter view
Flexibility, be calm under pressure and comfortable taking ownership in ambiguous environments

17) link =https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-maxwell-energy-system-pvt-ltd-bengaluru-7-to-10-years-180424500790?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165_1&xp=2&px=2
Job description
We are seeking a highly motivated and experienced Technical Program Manager (TPM) to join our growing team. In this role,

you will be responsible for the successful planning, execution, and delivery of complex embedded hardware projects. You will play a pivotal role in ensuring projects stay on track, meet deadlines, and adhere to budget constraints.


Partner with engineering teams to define project scope, timelines, and resource allocation.
Develop and maintain comprehensive project plans, including milestones, deliverables, and risk assessments.
Manage project depend
18)
link =https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-postman-bengaluru-5-to-10-years-180424500441?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165_1&xp=3&px=2
Job description
As a Technical Program Manager, you will play a key role in driving the planning, execution, and delivery of complex technical initiatives and projects within our organisation. You will collaborate closely with cross-functional product and platform teams, including engineering, product management, design, and operations, to ensure the successful delivery of cross functional programmes, and own the availability metrics for these high-quality software solutions and products.

Responsibilities
Lead the end-to-end project lifecycle, from project initiation to delivery, ensuring alignment with business objectives, timelines, and budget constraints, you will get to run multiple programs and projects in the areas of operations, quality and performance engineering and will be working closely with all levels of leadership in the broader organisation to drive business impacting results
Design and execute cross cutting programs that involve a broad level metric ownership, proven ability to track via data, and drive the results via collaboration
Communicate effectively with stakeholders, including executives, product owners, and team members, to gather requirements, define project scope, and manage expectations, in short, you should be super comfortable in driving results through assertive negotiations and tracking
Identify, assess, and mitigate risks and dependencies associated with technical projects, proactively addressing potential issues and challenges
Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including engineering, product management, design, and quality assurance, to define project goals, deliverables, and success criteria
Allocate resources, manage project timelines, and track progress against milestones, ensuring on-time and on-budget delivery of projects
Drive continuous improvement initiatives, process optimizations, and best practices adoption within the organisation, promoting efficiency and effectiveness
Maintain project/program documentation, status reports, and dashboards, providing visibility into project progress, metrics, and outcomes
Champion and promote Agile methodologies, frameworks, and practices, such as Scrum or Kanban, to foster a culture of agility, adaptability, and collaboration
Requirements
Bachelors or Masters degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or related field from a reputed school
Proven experience (5+ years) in technical program management or project management roles in software product development
Strong understanding of software development lifecycle (SDLC), Agile methodologies, and project management best practices
Excellent communication, leadership, and interpersonal skills, with the ability to collaborate effectively with cross-functional teams and stakeholders
Technical proficiency in API development, web technologies, cloud platforms, and software architecture concepts
Experience with project management tools, such as JIRA, and version control systems, such as Git, productivity tools like Figma, excalidraw etc.
You have to be super proficient with spreadsheets like google-sheets
PMP, Agile, or Scrum certification is a plus but not a deal breaker

19)
link =https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-cleartax-bengaluru-2-to-6-years-271023501237?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165_1&xp=6&px=2
Job description


Work with cross-functional teams to plan and execute complex technical
projects

Develop and maintain project plans and documentation

Identify and manage project risks and issues; and suggest feasible
solutions

Act as a liaison between technical and non-technical stakeholders

Work with product and engineering teams to prioritize feature development

Collaborate with the QA team to ensure the quality of deliverables

Manage communication with external vendors and partners in case any

Hands-on with data analysis; tracking usage metrics etc.

Requirements:

Bachelors degree in Computer Science or a related field

3-5 years of experience in technical program management

Experience working in a SAAS environment

Excellent project management skills, including experience with Agile
methodologies

Strong technical background, with experience in software development and
architecture

Excellent communication and interpersonal skills

Strong problem-solving and analytical skills

Experience with JIRA or other project management tools

20)
link = https://www.naukri.com/job-listings-technical-program-manager-4crisk-ai-bengaluru-7-to-12-years-190922501976?src=seo_srp&sid=17188836958104165_1&xp=7&px=2
Job description
What Your Day-to-day Will Look Like:
Build strong and aligned program teams to efficiently deliver technical solutions.
Collaborate with Engineering and business owners to define program requirements, set priorities, and establish scope which includes defining the roadmap and long-term strategy of the teams that you are partnering with.
Manage cross functional dependencies, risks, and changes effectively by optimizing scope, schedule, and resources accordingly.
Develop and own communication plans to effectively and proactively communicate program status, issues, and risks to stakeholders.
Partner with cross functional teams to drive technical analysis, design, development, testing, implementation, and post implementation phases.
Define and track key metrics and key quality and performance indicators and drive cross functional execution of program deliverables.
Proactively identify and analyze complex, long-term, critical infrastructure problems with engineering leaders and stakeholders.
Influence product decisions to align with higher company initiatives.
Drive internal and external process improvements across multiple teams and functions including reducing the manual efforts through automation.

You are the person we need if you have experience with:
Work on complex Analytical SaaS (Software as a Service) Software by showcasing a high-level proficiency in technical project management
Masters degree in Project / Program Management or related technical field required
7+ years of software engineering, systems engineering, hardware engineering, or technical product/program management experience.
Experience delivering tech programs or products from inception to delivery.
Experienced in executing strategic decisions, enthusiasm for high-level planning and risk management skills
Knowledge of user needs, gathering requirements, and defining scope.
Experience operating autonomously across multiple teams, demonstrated critical thinking, and thought leadership.
Communication experience and experience working with technical management teams to develop systems, solutions, and products.
Excellent time management and organizational skills and experience establishing guidelines in these areas for others
Strong sense of personal accountability regarding decision-making and supervision
Experience working in a high-level collaborative environment and promoting teamwork
Managerial experience applying analytical thinking and problem-solving skills
What will you learn on a day to day:
Increase your proficiency on a daily basis by working on some of the complex AI visualizations.
Work with cross functional teams to define, strategize and execute business goals


21)
link = https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=54dd15f4b1d337b5&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Full job description
About DocuSign

DocuSign helps organizations connect and automate how they navigate their systems of agreement. As part of its industry leading product lineup, DocuSign offers eSignature, the world's #1 way to sign electronically on practically any device, from almost anywhere, at any time.


Twenty years ago, DocuSign was founded, and we began our journey from creating the world’s leading eSignature solution to delivering a smarter, easier, and more trusted agreement workflow. Today, more than a billion users in over 180 countries use DocuSign. We’ve been named a great workplace for diversity and named a trusted company; we’ve been recognized time and time again for our innovation and leadership; we’ve reached carbon neutrality; and we now generate $2.5 billion in annual revenue.


Job Description

8+ years leading complex, cross-functional, global programs in SaaS based
products
Proficient using Atlassian Toolset: Jira, Confluence, Portfolio/Advanced Reporting..etc
B.S degree in Computer science or a related comparable field of study
Equally confident in working with executive team members as working with software developers.
Experience building strong cross-team relationships and partnerships
Proficient using Atlassian Toolset: Jira, Confluence, Portfolio/Advanced Reporting..etc
Skilled at dealing with ambiguity in a rapidly growing and changing environment
Experience in a company that has scaled or experience in both small and large scale software development organizations.
Strong business acumen and technical background, with the ability to quickly understand and communicate technical concepts and challenges across wide-ranging audiences
Ability to manage multiple stakeholders and expectations

8-12 years
Technical Program Management / Jira / Confluence / Stakeholder
Develop program road maps and strategies and execute
As a leader, communicate complex technical ideas across teams

22)
link = https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=b60866bd50dd733f&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Full job description
Do you want a role where you get to touch every PC in the world and be a part of a team that fuels the $59B Windows Hardware business? The Driver Servicing team, within the Azure Edge + Platform group, is on a mission to enlighten hundreds of millions of systems with high quality and resilient drivers and firmware, and we need you to achieve that.
As a Senior Technical Program Manager of the Device Servicing team working on end to end driver/firmware servicing, you get to work on lighting up some latest and coolest category of devices and scenarios, you get to go deep on some super technical areas, you get to collaborate with many technology teams (device teams, Dev Center, Data Science, Fundamentals and etc), and you get to engage with external partners (Silicon partners, OEMs and end customers). It's an exciting space that creates huge impact to end user satisfaction to Windows devices. The candidate has demonstrated a track record of problem-solving, technical excellence, customer and partner empathy, collaboration, and a dedication for delivering customer focused software. The candidate should enjoy working in a dynamic and fast-paced work environment, be able to hit the ground running, solve deep design and technical problems, and work across groups.
We are a diverse and inclusive team, and we thrive by placing high value on integrating the perspectives, voices and needs of all our partners, customers, and Microsoft peers.
Microsoft’s mission is to empower every person and every organization on the planet to achieve more. As employees we come together with a growth mindset, innovate to empower others, and collaborate to realize our shared goals. Each day we build on our values of respect, integrity, and accountability to create a culture of inclusion where everyone can thrive at work and beyond.
Responsibilities
Deliver success in our most strategic set of Objectives and Ker Results (OKRs)
Project scope definition and planning through delivery of assigned product and related product releases
Ensure the oversight and coordination of dependencies across the project and resolve or escalate conflicts
Provide customer input represented in both technical and business terms with descriptive requirements to ensure the value of the project is realized
Deliver, document, and circulate an end-to-end plan, including activity, dependencies, timing, and ownership. Follow up with specific owners to deliver components of the project on-time
Conduct regular meetings with the senior executive bodies to inform and alert them of any issues arising from the performance of the individual projects within the portfolio to assure the on-plan usage and consumption of resources and funding, and to highlight any variances
Lead reviews of any significant initiatives, projects or programs that are challenged and provide recommendations as to whether it should continue, be significantly changed, placed on hold or discontinued
Arrive at sound decisions that generate results, uses data and other inputs to make decisions, owns decision, and takes accountability for work using strong organizational and analytical skills

Qualifications
Required qualifications

Bachelor's Degree AND 8+ years experience in engineering, product/technical program management, data analysis, or product development OR equivalent experience
2+ years of experience managing cross-functional and/or cross-team projects

Preferred qualifications

Demonstrated track record of driving and managing large scale products and features across multiple releases
Able to solve hard problems quickly, effectively, independently and in collaboration with development and quality engineering
Effective interpersonal and cross-team collaboration skills
Effective written and verbal communication skills
Program Management of low-level hardware scenarios
Deep knowledge of operating system fundamentals, especially as they relate to device drivers

#IDCAzureEPHiring

Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. Consistent with applicable law, all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, citizenship, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, immigration status, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran or military status, race, ethnicity, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable local laws, regulations and ordinances. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application process, read more about requesting accommodations.

23)
link = https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=465ada52647209d3&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Full job description
Job Summary: We are seeking a highly motivated and experienced Technical Program Manager to join our fast-growing EdTech startup. As a Technical Program Manager, you will play a crucial role in overseeing the successful execution and delivery of our technical projects, ensuring alignment with business objectives. This is a remote position that can be based anywhere in the world, offering a unique opportunity to work in a global environment.

Responsibilities:

Project Management: Manage end-to-end project lifecycle, including project planning, scoping, scheduling, and execution.
Technical Leadership: Provide technical expertise and guidance to cross-functional teams, including software engineers, designers, and product managers, throughout the project lifecycle.
Requirement Gathering: Collaborate with stakeholders to define project requirements, objectives, and success criteria, ensuring a clear understanding of project scope and deliverables.
Resource Management: Allocate and manage resources effectively, ensuring tasks are assigned, tracked, and completed on time.
Risk Management: Identify project risks and proactively implement mitigation strategies to minimize impact on project delivery.
Stakeholder Communication: Facilitate communication and collaboration between internal teams and external partners, ensuring timely updates and transparency throughout the project.
Quality Assurance: Define and enforce quality standards, ensuring that projects meet established criteria and adhere to best practices.
Process Improvement: Continuously evaluate and improve project management processes and methodologies to enhance efficiency and effectiveness.
Documentation: Create and maintain project documentation, including project plans, status reports, and technical specifications.
Remote Team Management: Foster a positive and productive remote work culture, supporting team members in achieving their goals and maintaining high levels of motivation and engagement.
Requirements:

Technical Background: Strong technical background with experience in software development, web technologies, or related disciplines. Familiarity with cloud-based infrastructure and scalable systems is a plus.
Project Management Skills: Proven track record in successfully managing complex technical projects, delivering results on time and within budget.
Communication: Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to effectively convey technical concepts to both technical and non-technical stakeholders.
Leadership: Strong leadership skills with the ability to influence and motivate cross-functional teams and drive project success.
Problem Solving: Strong analytical and problem-solving skills, with the ability to navigate through challenges and find creative solutions.
Adaptability: Comfortable working in a fast-paced, dynamic startup environment with changing priorities and requirements.
Remote Work: Demonstrated experience in remote work, including effective remote collaboration and team management.
Education: Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related technical field. Advanced degrees or certifications are a plus.
Join our team and contribute to revolutionizing education through technology. Apply now to be a part of our global and remote-friendly EdTech startup.

24)
link = https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=8f00d17e93a546c5&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Benefits
Pulled from the full job description
Cell phone reimbursement
Health insurance
Internet reimbursement
Paid time off
&nbsp;
Full job description
At Coinbase, our mission is to increase economic freedom around the world, and we couldn’t do this without hiring the best people. We’re a group of hard-working overachievers who are deeply focused on building the future of finance and Web3 for our users across the globe, whether they’re trading, storing, staking or using crypto. Know those people who always lead the group project? That’s us.

There are a few things we look for across all hires we make at Coinbase, regardless of role or team. First, we look for candidates who will thrive in a culture like ours, where we default to trust, embrace feedback, and disrupt ourselves. Second, we expect all employees to commit to our mission-focused approach to our work. Finally, we seek people who are excited to learn about and live crypto, because those are the folks who enjoy the intense moments in our sprint and recharge work culture. We’re a remote-first company looking to hire the absolute best talent all over the world.

Ready to #LiveCrypto? Who you are:

You’ve got positive energy. You’re optimistic about the future and determined to get there.
You’re never tired of learning. You want to be a pro in bleeding edge tech like DeFi, NFTs, DAOs, and Web 3.0.
You appreciate direct communication. You’re both an active communicator and an eager listener - because let’s face it, you can’t have one without the other. You’re cool with candid feedback and see every setback as an opportunity to grow.
You can pivot on the fly. Crypto is constantly evolving, so our priorities do, too. What you worked on last month may not be what you work on today, and that excites you. You’re not looking for a boring job.
You have a “can do” attitude. Our teams create high-quality work on quick timelines. Owning a problem doesn’t scare you, but rather empowers you to take 100% responsibility for achieving our mission.
You want to be part of a winning team. We’re stronger together, and you’re a person who embraces being pushed out of your comfort zone.
The Compliance Product Strategy and Programs team at Coinbase is looking for a world class TPM Manager that can help lead strategic and complex initiatives between technical teams and business stakeholders across financial product compliance

What you’ll be doing (ie. job duties):

Set cross functional business objectives, align cross-functional teams, and execute through design and technical implementation
Plan, scope, resource, coordinate, communicate status, manage risks and track progress across multiple product workstreams
Create and support cross functional program deliverables including program plans, quarterly objectives and associated initiatives, BRDs, PRDs, TDDs, product launch approval etc.
Serve as the liaison between Compliance SMEs, Product and Eng to deliver initiatives
Plan, scope, resource, coordinate, communicate status, manage risks and track progress across multiple product work streams
Work closely with product and engineering stakeholders throughout the product development lifecycle to resolve blockers, influence decisions, address questions, and balance between functionality and user experience
What we look for in you (ie. job requirements):

6+ years of experience within market facing FinTech products as a Technical Program Manager
Experience balancing product and business priorities with operational compliance requirements
Strong agile experience within the product development life cycle
Proven experience solving for tradeoffs between operational requirements and user experience
Strong ability to identify, resolve and escalate risks and issues
Critical thinker who has consistently been sought after to find win-win solutions across various teams with competing priorities
Ability to adapt quickly to evolving program needs while effectively navigating Coinbase teams across Product, Engineering, Legal, Compliance and CX
Experience working in a global, large-scale, complex, and fast-paced environment
Bachelor’s degree in finance, computer science, engineering, economics or related field
Nice to haves:

Experience in Top Tier consulting firm or FinTech
MBA or advanced certifications in Program or Project management
Experience with financial product compliance KYC, BSA, OFAC, AML
Advanced understanding of product development and control architecture
Experience with JIRA, Looker, SQL
Job #: P56828

Commitment to Equal Opportunity
Coinbase is committed to diversity in its workforce and is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, sex, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation or any other basis protected by applicable law. Coinbase will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with applicable federal, state and local law. For US applicants, you may view the Know Your Rights notice. Additionally, Coinbase participates in the E-Verify program in certain locations, as required by law.

Coinbase is also committed to providing reasonable accommodations to individuals with disabilities. If you need a reasonable accommodation because of a disability for any part of the employment process, please contact us at accommodations[at]coinbase.com to let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

Global Data Privacy Notice for Job Candidates and Applicants
Depending on your location, the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) may regulate the way we manage the data of job applicants. Our full notice outlining how data will be processed as part of the application procedure for applicable locations is available. By submitting your application, you are agreeing to our use and processing of your data as required. For US applicants only, by submitting your application you are agreeing to arbitration of disputes as outlined.


Benefits at Coinbase

Medical insurance including Dental & Vision for employees and dependants
Group Personal Accidental Insurance
Group Term Life Insurance
Employee Stock Purchase Plan (ESPP)
Wellness Stipend
Mobile/Internet Reimbursement
Remote-First Stipend
Connections Stipend
Learning and Development Allowance
Employee Assistance Program
Travel Medical Policy – Global Traveler
Fertility Benefits
Generous Time Off/Leave Policy

25)
link =https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=8a65efd53adc3dfa&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Full job description
About Us
Angel One Limited (formerly known as Angel Broking Limited) is a Fintech company providing broking services, margin trading facility, loan against shares, research services, depository services, investment education and financial products distribution to its clients, on a mission to become the No. 1 fintech organization in India. With more than 11 million registered clients and over 28 million app downloads, we are onboarding an average of about 400K new clients every month. We are working to build personalized financial journeys for our clients via a single app, powered by new-age engineering tech and Machine Learning. We are a group of self-driven, motivated individuals who enjoy taking ownership and believe in providing best value for money to investors through innovative products and investment strategies. We apply and amplify design thinking with our products and solution. We have a flat structure, with ample opportunity to showcase your talent and a growth path for engineers to the very top. We are remote-first, with people spread across the country. Come on Onboard, to become a part of this epic journey! We are aggressively hiring Engineers, Product Managers & Data science rockstars across India.. check out our career’s sections!

About The Role
We are looking for a Director Technical Program Management (TPM) to join our Program Management office. You will partner with Business, Product, Engineering, QE, SRE and support teams to plan and deliver large and complex initiatives for Angle One.

You will lead at multiple levels, as a thought partner for executive stakeholders, as a manager in overseeing work of the team and as an Individual Contributor on priority projects. You will lead a team of TPMs working across a set of Product areas and plan and help deliver the programs and projects.

Key responsibilities

Build Program structure and strategy

Drive product planning along with Business, Product, Engineering and QE teams

Manage dependencies both internal and external

Track various Programs in effective way

Identify risks and issues and manage mitigation and resolution strategies.

Effective communication to various stakeholders

Hire and retain and top class team

Skills and Experience

14+ years of Experience in Software/Tech industry, with 6+ in Running cross functional Programs

2+ years of people Management

Deep understanding of SDLC

Experience working with complex multi stakeholder programs and driving business value

Metrics driven

Ability to resolve conflicts across groups

Ability to synthesize complex information and take decisions, handle ambiguous situations

Clear Concise communication skills

Fintech experience will be a plus

At Angel One, our thriving culture is rooted in Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion (DEI).

As an Equal opportunity employer, we wholeheartedly welcome people from all backgrounds irrespective of caste, religion, gender, marital status, sexuality, disability, class or age to be part of our team.

We believe that everyone’s unique experiences and viewpoints make us stronger together.

Come and be a part of #OneSpace, where your individuality is celebrated and embraced.

Working With Us
We strive to help millions of Indians make informed investment decisions. We constantly are in search of the brightest, most talented individuals to join our world-class team. We give each of our teammates the freedom to ideate, innovate, express, solve and create customer experience through #Fintech & #ConsumerTech. With our continuous learning interventions and upskilling, we carved out the best of each of our teammates.

Benefits
We have a “work-from-anywhere” policy.
We have flexible work timing and fast-track promotions for all our employees.
Our employees enjoy highly competitive pay structures. One of the best!
AngelOne has been 6-time certified as a “Great Place To Work” culture.
Long & Short term incentives to reward our team members for their efforts.
Enjoy benefits like: Annual Leaves, Insurance Mediclaim, Variable Pay plans, internet allowance and many more.
Location

Work From Anywhere in India

26)
link = https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=9d06ec9d0e63c550&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Full job description
Minimum qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, a related technical field, or equivalent practical experience.
2 years of experience in program management.
Experience translating engineering discussions into actionable engineering tasks and next steps.

Preferred qualifications:
Experience with vendor management, contract negotiations, and measuring vendor performance.
Experience with network planning and engineering, including long haul and metro networks, network availability, and resiliency analysis.
Experience working in a network vendor or telecommunications carrier environment.
Experience in, or knowledge of cloud networking, DWDM, fiber, interconnect, peering, IP network planning, or implementation role at an ISP, telecoms operator, carrier, or CDN, encompassing technical, commercial, and legal areas of the above.
About the job
A problem isn’t truly solved until it’s solved for all. That’s why Googlers build products that help create opportunities for everyone, whether down the street or across the globe. As a Technical Program Manager at Google, you’ll use your technical expertise to lead complex, multi-disciplinary projects from start to finish. You’ll work with stakeholders to plan requirements, identify risks, manage project schedules, and communicate clearly with cross-functional partners across the company. You're equally comfortable explaining your team's analyses and recommendations to executives as you are discussing the technical tradeoffs in product development with engineers.

Our goal is to build a Google that looks like the world around us — and we want Googlers to stay and grow when they join us. As part of our efforts to build a Google for everyone, we build diversity, equity, and inclusion into our work and we aim to cultivate a sense of belonging throughout the company.

As a Technical Program Manager at Google, you lead complex, multidisciplinary projects. You will plan requirements with customers and own projects through the entire project lifecycle. This includes managing project schedules, identifying risks, and clearly communicating goals to project stakeholders. These projects often span multiple locations, time zones, and hemispheres, and it's your job to keep all the players coordinated on the project's progress and deadlines. You will identify, scope, and manage projects that increase the value of Alphabet’s Enterprise Network and other networking products and services to our users and customers.

Google Cloud accelerates every organization’s ability to digitally transform its business and industry. We deliver enterprise-grade solutions that leverage Google’s cutting-edge technology, and tools that help developers build more sustainably. Customers in more than 200 countries and territories turn to Google Cloud as their trusted partner to enable growth and solve their most critical business problems.

Responsibilities
Create multi-year metro or region level network strategies to provide resilient connectivity meeting technical, operational, and commercial requirements while balancing performance and cost.
Evaluate alternatives and develop cost estimates for project-specific feasibility studies. Prepare drawings, maps, scopes of work, and other materials as needed to clearly describe projects to external vendors and internal stakeholders.
Create and present business cases for long-term investments in network and infrastructure.
Keep abreast of global industry best practices for end-to-end management of multi-functional technical projects and programs.
Execute agreements for metro-ethernet, internet, dark fiber, and wavelength services under existing master agreements.
Google is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. See also Google's EEO Policy and EEO is the Law. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know by completing our Accommodations for Applicants form.

27)
link = https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=8fc25f827575b029&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Full job description
You Lead the Way. We’ve Got Your Back.

With the right backing, people and businesses have the power to progress in incredible ways. When you join Team Amex, you become part of a global and diverse community of colleagues with an unwavering commitment to back our customers, communities and each other. Here, you’ll learn and grow as we help you create a career journey that’s unique and meaningful to you with benefits, programs, and flexibility that support you personally and professionally.

At American Express, you’ll be recognized for your contributions, leadership, and impact—every colleague has the opportunity to share in the company’s success. Together, we’ll win as a team, striving to uphold our company values and powerful backing promise to provide the world’s best customer experience every day. And we’ll do it with the utmost integrity, and in an environment where everyone is seen, heard and feels like they belong.

Join Team Amex and let's lead the way together.

As part of our diverse tech team, you can architect, code and ship software that makes us an essential part of our customers’ digital lives. Here, you can work alongside versatile engineers in an open, supportive, inclusive environment where your voice is valued, and you make your own decisions on what tech to use to solve exciting problems. American Express offers a range of opportunities to work with the latest technologies and encourages you to back the broader engineering community through open source. And because we understand the importance of keeping your skills fresh and relevant, we give you dedicated time to invest in your professional development. Find your place in technology of #TeamAmex.

How will you make an impact in this role?

The US Consumer Services and Digital Technologies Cross Platform Delivery team, that is the strategic Technology capability responsible for planning and delivering technology products to market at scale, across platforms, delivery teams and external partners.

The candidate will work within and across workstreams for Enterprise Data Governance and management and will focus on delivery of key initiatives with aspects of, but not limited to data classification, metadata management, data sharing and data quality. This role will require you to collaborate with multi-functional leaders in Technology and product teams to drive data technology decisions, innovations, and implementation. Additionally, you will play a key role in ensuring American Express meets all regulatory requirements and protects the data of its members by fostering and promoting standard processes in data governance through voicing support for and collaborating with various teams in the company.

The successful candidate will play a lead role in the understanding of product strategy and collaborate with their peers, technology teams, and product owners to translate complex user stories into successful outputs.

Minimum Qualifications

Bachelor of Science in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or equivalent experience in Data.

Deep understanding of all aspects of software design, with a demonstrated track record of growing responsibility.

Steers technical program conversations (e.g., relating to architectural approach and system design) and articulates solutions; co-develops and documents solution

Partner with the governance team and contribute to all aspects of reporting for senior leaders.

Drive program, release level, continuous improvement and standardization activities using SAFe as the primary framework.

Provide insight into gaps, issues, risks and opportunities across scrum teams, solving and calling out impediments as needed.

Facilitates and plans change management and release management activities.

Identifies and addresses complex inter-team technical dependencies, bridges gaps in technical management

Experience in clarifying objectives, dealing with ambiguity/under-defined problems, advocating for simplification, and influencing teams.

Experience managing project budgets and reporting.

Excellent oral and written communication skills; Ability to effectively communicate across third parties and technology and product managers.

Use technology Competence to provide design alternatives and support team in issue resolution.

4+ Experience using Rally agile delivery management platform is a plus.

4+ Experience with Data Engineering, Governance, Data policies

Partner with critical teams across the organization to implement data governance and management capabilities, working closely with engineering teams to enable teams across American Express to align with governance requirements and improve data quality.

Collaborates with Engineering teams to drive alignment architectural approach and technical strategy to execute delivery

Participates with product and engineering leaders to build implementation roadmaps

Preferred Qualifications

Consistent track record of working independently and making key decisions on projects.

Confirmed ability to lead change in dynamic, ambiguous environment and ability to influence without direct authority among peers and with leaders.

Influence team members with innovative changes and improvements by demonstrating risk taking.

7+ years of Software Project Management experience, part of it using Agile methodologies.

Ability to effectively interpret Technology and product objectives and challenges and support the team in delivering.

Envision end to end pipeline and translate it to the Tech team.

We back our colleagues and their loved ones with benefits and programs that support their holistic well-being. That means we prioritize their physical, financial, and mental health through each stage of life. Benefits include:

Competitive base salaries
Bonus incentives
Support for financial-well-being and retirement
Comprehensive medical, dental, vision, life insurance, and disability benefits (depending on location)
Flexible working model with hybrid, onsite or virtual arrangements depending on role and business need
Generous paid parental leave policies (depending on your location)
Free access to global on-site wellness centers staffed with nurses and doctors (depending on location)
Free and confidential counseling support through our Healthy Minds program
Career development and training opportunities
American Express is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran status, disability status, age, or any other status protected by law.

Offer of employment with American Express is conditioned upon the successful completion of a background verification check, subject to applicable laws and regulations.

28)
link = https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=dbc17e816a340f4b&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Full job description
Career Area:

Engineering
Job Description:

Your Work Shapes the World at Caterpillar Inc.

When you join Caterpillar, you're joining a global team who cares not just about the work we do – but also about each other. We are the makers, problem solvers, and future world builders who are creating stronger, more sustainable communities. We don't just talk about progress and innovation here – we make it happen, with our customers, where we work and live. Together, we are building a better world, so we can all enjoy living in it.

Job Summary:

As a Technical Program Manager at Caterpillar, you will be responsible for creating Functional & Detailed Technical Requirements for TechAdvisor.CAT.com – a digital application that enables Dealers to improve Sales, Service & Support experience on Digital Technology Applications for CI & RI Domain.

You will work with Commercial, Service & Support Teams & Digital Application owners of CI and RI Domains to sensitize a Common User experience to Configure/ Integrate/ Support the right Technology Option. You will understand the requirements prioritized by the Dealer Community to develop Proof of Concepts of various Features & vet it with Dealers to gain interest and further prioritize those Features for Future releases. You will drive Technical Marketing strategies to promote TechAdvisor.CAT.com to our Dealers.

In addition, you will create business/ commercial proposals on developing ideas/ concepts to improve our Digital offering to our Construction Customers & drive its execution.

Key Responsibilities:

Project Leadership: Lead the planning, execution, and delivery of complex technical programs, ensuring alignment with strategic goals and objectives.
Stakeholder Management: Collaborate with stakeholders, including product managers, engineers, and senior management, to define project scope, objectives, and deliverables.
Technical Oversight: Provide technical guidance and direction to project teams, ensuring technical solutions align with business needs and architectural standards.
Risk Management: Identify potential risks and develop mitigation strategies to ensure project success.
Resource Management: Allocate resources effectively, balancing workload and priorities to ensure optimal productivity and project delivery.
Performance Tracking: Monitor project progress, track key performance indicators (KPIs), and report status to stakeholders and senior management.
Process Improvement: Implement and refine project management processes to enhance efficiency, quality, and delivery timelines.
Communication: Maintain clear and effective communication channels with all project stakeholders, providing regular updates and addressing any issues promptly.
Budget Management: Manage project budgets, ensuring projects are delivered within financial constraints.
Qualifications:

Education: Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field. Advanced degree or relevant certifications (e.g., PMP, Agile, Scrum) preferred.
Experience: Minimum of 5-7 years of experience in a technical program management role, preferably within a manufacturing or engineering environment.
Skills:
Strong leadership and team-building capabilities.
Excellent problem-solving and analytical skills.
Proficient in project management methodologies (e.g., Agile, Scrum, Waterfall).
Effective communication and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work collaboratively with cross-functional teams.
Technical Knowledge: Familiarity with manufacturing processes, product development, and quality management systems.
Key Competencies:

Strategic Thinking
Technical Expertise
Results Orientation
Change Management
Adaptability and Flexibility
Initiative and Proactivity
Collaboration and Influence

29)
link = https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=65453f689c16b69c&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Full job description
About the Role

Product Management at Flipkart is responsible for answering the question of what technology needs to be built to solve a particular business problem at scale. The function is in a great position to define how E-Commerce in India will look like and will also shape the future of supply chain, retail, e-commerce, payments, customer experience/trust etc.

Product Managers are at the helm of all crucial information – be it customer insights or business intelligence. They bend and wield this high-profile career position with proven leadership skills to provide the market knowledge and consumer understanding to reflect and resolve with that wisdom, analysis, and resourcefulness. Product Managers etch our new product features, ward us off if needed, think up a roadmap to support our goals and strategies, and sync together with other platform teams on cross-functional initiatives.

At Flipkart, a high focus on Impact and Ownership allows for freedom for each to experiment and innovate. Pride is when you see the impact of what you have created. The ability to see what your contribution does to the business is a rare experience, add to that the fact that the impact of it is felt by your friends and family in India - the experience is extremely gratifying.

Your Array (Nice To Haves)

Deep Product Thinking to map our goals into roadmaps, new product features, and strategies.
Strong Collaboration skills with which you work with other platform teams on cross-functional initiatives, to drive and implement the product idea you defined and see them through delivery.
Strong Execution in a fast-moving, and sometimes chaotic environment because high personal productivity is your nirvana.
Excellent communication skills that will open new windows of opportunities for our business.
Strong data-driven analytical skills
Dealing with ambiguity - to operate and thrive on partial and still have a track record of building successful teams
You (Must Have)

Understand customer data deeply, and partner with different Flipkart teams to identify new areas to drive down costs using existing and new insights.
Strong tech background with a good understanding of driving integration between systems
Good exposure in the product life cycle and driving execution
Strong communication and evangelization skills to kick off & drive partnerships with other teams
Strong communication and presentation skills. Ability to articulate progress and plans clear to the leadership team and get their feedback
Bachelors in Computer Science or equivalent preferred
Strong program management skills, with ability to manage multiple stakeholders at various levels.
About the team

The Accounting Product team has the following key priorities (1) Lead the overall Financial Reporting and Hygiene for Flipkart (2) Invest heavily in platformization constructs in Accounting (3) Ensure BAU efforts on Payouts, Invoicing, Taxation, and MEC continue to remain stable and drive faster execution in Strategic Programs (4) Extend Accounting stack to other group companies like Myntra, Jabong, FK Wholesale and set it up for Externalisation.

30)
link = https://in.indeed.com/q-technical-program-manager-l-india-jobs.html?vjk=a14ea204ef0a0c9e&aceid=&gad_source=1&gclid=CjwKCAjwps-zBhAiEiwALwsVYbyKIEEgKeGRhJfQQAEaNqUwHAZD1ntPWpBHUY2tT49ygPtQuQsfYRoCkN8QAvD_BwE&gclsrc=aw.ds
Location
Bengaluru, Karnataka
&nbsp;
Full job description
Company Overview
Intuit is the global financial technology platform that powers prosperity for the people and communities we serve. With approximately 100 million customers worldwide using products such as TurboTax, Credit Karma, QuickBooks, and Mailchimp, we believe that everyone should have the opportunity to prosper. We never stop working to find new, innovative ways to make that possible.

Job Overview
The Staff Technical Program Manager is a key member of the Development Services and Experiences (DevX) program team. He/she drives execution on one or more technology or business and process improvement initiatives within Intuit Platform (IP).

Qualifications
What you'll bring:

To be successful in this role, the candidate must have the following:

Degree in engineering, computer science, information systems or equivalent experience; development experience preferred
Experience managing software development projects and managing large operational systems in a fast paced, agile environment; platform as a service experience a plus
Self-starter able to track complex and/or large volume of details (technical and project related), manage and coordinate with 10-15 scrum teams, across multiple sites
Ability to communicate with engineers and execs, tailoring as appropriate. Ability to get into the details, as well as provide summarized exec views. Self-awareness of what to share with each audience.
10+ years of Program Management team leadership experience, including 8 or more years leading multiple complex technology-focused programs
Knowledge and use of industry standard program/project methods, tools and techniques
Responsibilities
How you will lead:

In this role, you will have the opportunity to:

Portfolio
Connect the dots across various programs within a portfolio to simplify the ‘why/what/how’
Partner with the Portfolio Leadership Team to unblock/guide program teams’ delivery
Identify and/or simplify portfolio level processes enabling the org to operate smoothly
Program
Develop a program structure and drive a program operating rhythm to bring together complex, cross-organizational teams.
Drive creation of program roadmaps and execution plans across all phases of planning, development, and production readiness and launch.
Collaborate with key stakeholders in executive teams, product management & engineering, and various cross-functional teams to effectively drive towards program outcomes.
Quickly and effectively, identify and clarify the critical issues and dependencies that need action and drive them through to closure. Communicate results clearly and in actionable form. Effectively balance business needs versus technical constraints.
Communicate progress across the organization and at all levels; includes program status, risks, dependencies and change control.
General
Thrive in establishing order and clarity amongst ambiguity and chaos.
Work well with others when conflicts arise, with ability to influence others to work towards desired outcomes.
Anticipate, recognize, and work through resistance or setbacks independently.

31)
link = https://in.linkedin.com/jobs/technical-program-manager-jobs?position=1&pageNum=0
Engineering @ JioCinema Our engineering team defines the technical architecture and drives itself to build systems that serve billions of requests per day, cosmic scales of video content streamed every day, with ultra-low latency design and high reliability. We make sure every byte of video content gets to millions of viewers, at the highest quality possible. We are growing fast and looking for talented Engineers who are up for one of the biggest yet outcomes in the video streaming business as we gun to be the primary destination for digital first entertainment in India and make JioCinema accessible to every Indian.

What Will You Do

Project Management: To lead and oversee the entire product development lifecycle, ensuring that projects are completed on time, within scope, and budget
Technical Expertise: Understand the technical aspects of our products and provide valuable insights and direction to the development teams
Cross - Functional Collaboration: Collaborate with cross-functional teams, including engineering, design, and content development, to ensure alignment on project goals and deliverables
Requirement Analysis: Work closely with stakeholders to gather and document project requirements, ensuring that they are clearly defined and understood
Risk Management: Implement rigorous risk checks at each tracking step, in collaboration with the respective partner. Mitigate risks with stakeholders and escalate when no immediate solution is available
Objectives & Key Results Alignment: Continuously align OKRs with changing priorities to facilitate continuous business evolution
Cross-Pod Dependencies: Track and allocate cross-pod dependencies to ensure efficient coordination across various teams
Pace Maintenance: Ensure the pace of the pod being handled is maintained according to Agile principles. Conduct sprint reviews, with designs and demos reviewed timely with leadership
Quality Assurance: Oversee quality control processes to ensure the final product meets high standards of quality and performance
Communication: Maintain clear and effective communication within the project team, with stakeholders, and with senior management, providing regular updates on project status
Resource Allocation: Allocate resources, set priorities, and make decisions on project assignment
Continuous Improvement: Implement and refine project management methodologies and best practices to enhance efficiency and productivity
Reporting: Generate regular project progress reports and present project status to senior management and stakeholders
Pod Ownership: Implement a "checkers at each stage" approach, where individual owners of the pod are responsible for maintaining JIRA, creating analytics reports, and delivering on committed date
Jira Expertise: Manage Jira issues and uphold the quality requirements of issue tracking, ensuring accurate and reliable project data.

Who Should Apply For This Role

7+ years of experience in Technical Program Management role
You are a skilled, experienced and data driven Technical Program Manager who can play a pivotal role in our product development
You have a robust technical background, outstanding project management skills, and the ability to work with cross-functional teams in delivering high-quality products on schedule
Batchelor's or Master's degree in a relevant field (e.g., Computer Science, Engineering).
Proven experience as a Technical Program Manager in a product-based company
Project Management Professional (PMP) or similar certification is a plus
Proficient in project management tools and software e.g Jira, Confluence, Jira plug-ins
Excellent problem-solving, analytical, and decision-making skills
Exceptional communication and leadership skills
Ability to excel in a fast-paced and dynamic environment.
A minimum of 2 years of experience in working with Jira and managing Jira issues.

32)
link = https://in.linkedin.com/jobs/technical-program-manager-jobs?currentJobId=3954404986&position=2&pageNum=0
As a Technical Program Manager (TPM) at Uber, you play a critical role in driving high-impact org-wide initiatives and continuously improving processes to increase the effectiveness of our engineering organizations. As a member of the Core Services TPM team, you will own and drive large, sophisticated cross-team technical initiatives for the Core Services organization.
Specifically, you will own the problem space, work closely with engineering leads to conceptualize solutions, organize/align multiple engineering teams for delivery, and drive execution leveraging critical metrics. You will look for ways to standardize, ensure execution is efficient and consistent, and set accountability by tracking progress, resolving dependencies, identifying issues, evaluating risks, and communicating status to leadership and collaborators. You will intrinsically act as a coach to engage and energize the product and engineering teams to achieve aggressive goals.


---- What the Candidate Will Do ----
You move fluidly from the big picture to the details so that the team can deliver complex and strategic cross-functional projects, often with tight deadlines. You are a bridge and a connector for the company. You are intuitive, focused, driven, organized, insightful, and productive. You break through communication issues and effectively develop relationships with collaborators at all levels of the organization. You build trust across the organization. You are not afraid to be direct, but you strive to act with emotional intelligence and integrity. Following are some of the core responsibilities of TPMs at Uber:
Manage complex and large-scale cross-team, multi-functional initiatives. Collaborate with engineering managers and engineers to estimate work efforts, define landmarks, and manage resources. Track progress, resolve dependencies, evaluate risks, and communicate status to upper management and program collaborators. Engage and energize ‌project teams to achieve aggressive goals.
Proactively remove obstacles to drive momentum and progress. Identify communication gaps, handle issue customer concerns, and provide support to teams balancing challenging priorities. Get results proactively.
Understand technical implementation at the architecture level and propose technical alternatives when necessary. Ask questions that clarify priorities and push the team to be highly effective. Develop broad domain and technical knowledge.
Help manage the cross-functional strategic planning and business planning process, leading conversations with key stakeholders to develop concepts for strategic initiatives, and developing those into detailed program / project plans (including roadmaps, resource planning, clear Objectives and measurable outcomes).
Continuously improve and scale the organization. Implement continuous improvements to the engineering organization and the program management process. Share program/project process frameworks, tools, and best practices that can be adopted throughout the organization. Improve product development and delivery. Mentor project management skills within our engineering leadership team.

---- Basic Qualifications ----
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience in Computer Science, Engineering, or equivalent practical experience.
Demonstrated ability as a TPM or Engineering Manager in a software, SaaS, or systems development environment
Solid technical capability and an ability to understand technical designs, challenges, and risks. Engineers enjoy working closely with you.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and exceptional emotional intelligence.
Shown strong cross-team and cross-org stakeholder management.
Analytical and truth-seeking. Ability to understand complex concepts and make reasoned decisions objectively.
Metrics-driven: Experience resolving effective program critical metrics and using them to measure program success and issues.
Strong organizational skills to juggle many tasks without losing sight of the highest priority items.
Excellent in identifying process gaps, measuring progress, and balancing engineering and product efficiency with process overhead.

33)
link = https://in.linkedin.com/jobs/technical-program-manager-jobs?currentJobId=3820990525&position=4&pageNum=0
Our work at NVIDIA is dedicated towards a computing model passionate about visual and AI computing. For two decades, NVIDIA has pioneered visual computing, the art and science of computer graphics, with our invention of the GPU. The GPU has also proven to be unbelievably effective at solving some of the most sophisticated problems in computer science. Today, NVIDIA’s GPU simulates human intelligence, running deep learning algorithms and acting as the brain of computers, robots and self-driving cars that can perceive and understand the world. Artificial intelligence is no longer science fiction. And in the next few years, it will transform every industry.

In your role as the Director of TPM (Technical Program Manager) and Geo Manager within our global IT PMO team, you will be responsible for overseeing a range of programs and projects related to Infrastructure, Automation, AI, Enterprise applications, Data, and Cloud in the corporate IT domain. Your responsibilities will include clarifying and scrutinizing objectives, crafting roadmaps, evaluating complexity and risks, addressing obstacles, and collaborating with a team of highly skilled technical professionals to deliver high-quality solutions efficiently and swiftly.

Collaborating with senior IT leaders, you will be accountable for the worldwide implementation of our IT enterprise strategies and programs, ensuring adherence to our PMO processes through consistent and timely execution. Your role will involve evaluating the health of programs, offering insights for necessary corrections, and facilitating the prompt resolution of issues as they arise. In the capacity of Geo Manager, your role involves serving as a liaison, representing the CIO and their leadership team in interactions with local site leaders. This includes managing service encouraging close teamwork and engagement, and participating in site-level leadership forums.

What You'll Be Doing

Formulate the roadmap and coordinate the implementation of a diverse range of IT Programs and projects.
Engage with regional business owners to comprehend the business roadmap, priorities, and facilitate the alignment of IT operations with business objectives.
Regularly connect with team members to lead expectations and provide project updates on scope, budget, and velocity.
Champion regional Initiative prioritization, aiding in the management and delivery of established standards and processes.
Propel consensus on standard methodologies in sourcing strategy, MSP utilization, and metric and SLO measurement.
Handle RESS/Space planning across the geography.
Collaborate with partners and the procurement team for contracts and negotiation strategies.
Implement IT policies and practices in the region, considering country-specific regulatory requirements.

What We Need To See

Bachelor’s degree in computer science or other related technical field or equivalent experience.
15+ Years of IT experience, 10+ years of experience successfully leading technical programs in a fast paced, multifaceted, enterprise environment with at least 3+ years’ experience as a geo lead.
Technical capability in Infrastructure, RESS/Build concepts, AI concepts including Generative AI, AIops, SecOps, Enterprise search products.
Business Intelligence/visualization tools experience.
Proven track record of delivering solutions when needed, while navigating a fast-paced environment with frequent shift in priorities.
Strong communication skills both written and verbal/presentations. Ability to bridge from high-level objectives to project details and vice-versa.
Ability to engage with IT & business leaders to unblock/advance projects as needed.
Ability to thrive within an agile framework.
Willingness to work with distributed team members across different time zones.

NVIDIA is widely considered to be one of the technology world’s most desirable employers. We have some of the most forward-thinking and hardworking people in the world working for us. If you're creative, results-oriented and enjoy having fun, then what are you waiting for? Apply today! NVIDIA is committed to fostering a diverse work environment and proud to be an equal opportunity employer. As we highly value diversity in our current and future employees, we do not discriminate (including in our hiring and promotion practices) on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status or any other characteristic protected by law.

34)
link = https://in.linkedin.com/jobs/technical-program-manager-jobs?currentJobId=3904636291&position=7&pageNum=0
Guidewire is looking for a Technical Program Manager within its Security organization to lead execution of critical security programs aligned with Guidewire’s security maturity strategy. This role will report to the Director of Program Management, Security. In this role, you will be driving key security initiatives in collaboration with Product, Engineering, and Enterprise teams/stakeholders. The ideal candidate understands security risks, software product and platform context, process efficiency and can effectively communicate with both technical and non-technical audiences.

Responsibilities:

Manage complex and cloud-scale technical security programs to meet Guidewire’s business objectives
Define and lead roadmap execution for critical security functions and programs
Develop strong partnerships and feedback loops with leaders and stakeholders across the organization
Lead with data and promote a culture of metrics driven decision-making, while holding stakeholders accountable
Be a thought leader to drive strategic change and help advance our security maturity
Communicate effectively verbally and in written form, both internal and external stakeholders including execs, engineering leads, consultants, and vendors



Requirements:

You are a pragmatic security expert and a hands-on technical program manager
You understand emerging and tried and tested security technology and how it applies to both cloud products and an enterprise environment
You evangelize proactive security within the organization and educate and influence stakeholders in building a secure environment
You enjoy working on hard problems with no clear answers and can work with SMEs to design, scope, and iterate to create prototypes to demonstrate value
You have experience driving security programs for a cloud company and its practical applications
You understand the value of efficient processes and constantly look to improve them for productive scaling
You are data driven, analytical, and can turn information into action



Qualifications:

B.S. degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or other relevant technical fields
5+ years of experience managing complex, cloud-scale technical security programs for an enterprise company
Experience with cloud platform and SaaS security required.
Experience with SOC 1, SOC 2, ISO 27001, PCI, or equivalent preferred
Experience with implementing modern Secure Product Development frameworks and practices
Demonstrated high level communication skills in both private and public settings
Familiarity with application of the NIST Cyber Security Framework towards security program maturity
Strong business acumen with excellent organizational, problem-solving, influencing without authority, and negotiating skills.

35)
link = https://in.linkedin.com/jobs/technical-program-manager-jobs?currentJobId=3955158723&position=11&pageNum=0
Technical Project Manager Responsibilities

Contributing ideas to product development initiatives.

Planning and managing product development stages.

Collaborating with system engineers and software architects.

Reporting product development progress to senior managers.

Ensuring that products are delivered on time and within budget.

Overseeing product deployment and integration.

Diagnosing and resolving technical issues.

Evaluating product performance metrics and facilitating adjustments.

Documenting processes and ensuring compliance with industry standards.

Keeping up with advancements in product technologies.

Technical Project Manager Requirements

Bachelor's degree in computer sciences, software engineering, technology management, business management, or similar.

3-5 years of experience in technical Project management, preferably in a related industry.

Advanced knowledge of the full life-cycle of product development.

Experience in product development planning and providing leadership.

Ability to collaborate with IT engineers and report to senior managers.

Extensive experience in software product engineering, deployment, and integration.

Ability to evaluate product performance metrics, as well as diagnose and resolve issues.

Ability to keep up with advancements in the field of technical product development.

Exceptional communication and interpersonal skills.

